en: E923, ammonium persulfate
xx: E923
ar: E923, بيرسلفات الأمونيوم
az: E923, Ammonium persulfat
bg: E923, Амониев персулфат
ca: E923, Persulfat d'amoni
cs: E923, Peroxodisíran amonný, N2H8S2O8, H8N2O8S2, (NH4)2S2O8
da: E923, Ammoniumpersulfat
de: E923, Ammoniumperoxodisulfat, (NH4)2S2O8, Diammoniumperoxodisulfat, Ammoniumpersulfat
el: E923, Υπερσουλφονικό αμμώνιο
eo: E923, Amonia persulfato
es: E923, Persulfato de amonio
et: E923, Ammooniumpersulfaat
fi: E923, Ammoniumpersulfaatti, Ammoniumpersulfaattia
fr: E923, Persulfate d'ammonium, 7727-54-0, (NH4)2S2O8
he: E923, אמוניום פרסולפט
hi: E923, अमोनियम परसल्फेट
hr: E923, Amonijev persulfat
hu: E923, Ammónium-perszulfát, Ammónium-peroxo-diszulfát
id: E923, Amonium persulfat
it: E923, Perossidisolfato d'ammonio, (NH4)2S2O8, Persolfato di ammonio
ja: E923, 過硫酸アンモニウム
ko: E923, 과황산 암모늄
lt: E923, Amonio persulfatas
lv: E923, Amonija persulfāts
mk: E923, Амониум персулфат
mt: E923, Persulfat tal-ammonju
nl: E923, Ammoniumpersulfaat, Ammoniumperoxydisulfaat
pl: E923, Nadsiarczan amonu
pt: E923, Persulfato de amônia
ro: E923, Persulfat de amoniu
ru: E923, Персульфат аммония
sk: E923, Peroxodisíran amónny
sl: E923, Amonijev persulfat
sq: E923, Persulfat amon
sr: E923, Амонијум персулфат
sv: E923, Ammoniumpersulfat, Ammoniumperoxidisulfat, Ammoniumperoxiddisulfat, Ammoniumperoxodisulfat
th: E923, แอมโมเนียมเปอร์ซัลเฟต
tr: E923, Amonyum persülfat
uk: E923, Персульфат амонію
vi: E923, Amoni persulfat
zh: E923, 过硫酸铵

en: E924, Potassium bromate
xx: E924
ar: E924, برومات البوتاسيوم
az: E924, Kalium bromat
bg: E924, Калиев бромат
ca: E924, Bromat de potassi
cs: E924, Bromičnan draselný, KBrO3, E 924
da: E924, Kaliumbromat
de: E924, Kaliumbromat, KBrO3
el: E924, Βρωμικό κάλιο
es: E924, Bromato de potasio
et: E924, Kaaliumbromaat
fi: E924, Kaliumbromaatti, Kaliumbromaattia
fr: E924, Bromate de potassium, 7758-01-2
he: E924, ברומט אשלגן
hi: E924, पोटेशियम ब्रोमेट
hu: E924, Kálium-bromátok
id: E924, Kalium bromat
it: E924, Bromato di potassio, KBrO3
ja: E924, 臭素酸カリウム
ko: E924, 브롬산 칼륨
lt: E924, Kalio bromatas
lv: E924, Kālija bromāts
nl: E924, Kaliumbromaten, Kaliumbromaat, KBrO3
pl: E924, Bromian potasu
pt: E924, Bromato de potássio
ro: E924, Bromat de potasiu
ru: E924, Бромат калия
sk: E924, Bromičnan draselný
sl: E924, Kalijev bromat
sv: E924, Kaliumbromat
th: E924, โพแทสเซียมโบรเมต
tr: E924, Potasyum bromat
uk: E924, Бромат калію
zh: E924, 溴酸钾

en: E924a, Potassium bromate
xx: E924a
ar: E924a, برومات البوتاسيوم
az: E924a, Kalium bromat
bg: E924a, Калиев бромат
ca: E924a, Bromat de potassi
cs: E924a, Broman draselný
da: E924a, Kaliumbromat
de: E924a, Kaliumbromat
el: E924a, Βρωμικό κάλιο
eo: E924a, Kalia bromato
es: E924a, Bromato de potasio
et: E924a, Kaaliumbromaat
fa: E924a, برمات پتاسیم
fi: E924a, Kaliumbromatti, Kaliumbromaattia
fr: E924a, Bromate de potassium
he: E924a, ברומט אשלגן
hi: E924a, पोटेशियम ब्रोमेट
hr: E924a, Kalijev bromat
hu: E924a, Kálium-bromát
id: E924a, Kalium bromat
it: E924a, Bromato di potassio
ja: E924a, 臭素酸カリウム
ko: E924a, 브롬산 칼륨
lt: E924a, Kalio bromatas
lv: E924a, Kālija bromāts
mk: E924a, Калиум бромат
mt: E924a, Bromat tal-potassju
nl: E924a, Kaliumbromaat
pl: E924a, Bromek potasu
pt: E924a, Bromato de potássio
ro: E924a, Bromat de potasiu
ru: E924a, Бромат калия
sk: E924a, Broman draselný
sl: E924a, Kalijev bromat
sq: E924a, Bromat kaliumi
sr: E924a, Калијум бромат
sv: E924a, Kaliumbromat
th: E924a, โพแทสเซียมโบรเมต
tr: E924a, Potasyum bromat
uk: E924a, Бромат калію
vi: E924a, Kali bromat
zh: E924a, 溴酸钾

en: E924b, Calcium bromate
xx: E924b
ar: E924b, برومات الكالسيوم
az: E924b, Kalsium bromat
bg: E924b, Калциев бромат
ca: E924b, Bromat de calci
cs: E924b, Bromičnan vápenatý
da: E924b, Calciumbromat
de: E924b, Calciumbromat
el: E924b, Βρωμικό ασβέστιο
eo: E924b, Kalcia bromato
es: E924b, Bromato de calcio
et: E924b, Kaltsiumbromaat
fi: E924b, Kalsiumbromaatti, Kalsiumbromaattia
fr: E924b, Bromate de calcium
he: E924b, ברומט הסידן
hi: E924b, कैल्शियम ब्रोमेट
hr: E924b, Kalcijev bromat
hu: E924b, Kalcium-bromát
id: E924b, Kalsium bromat
it: E924b, Bromato di calcio
ja: E924b, 臭素酸カルシウム
ko: E924b, 브롬산 칼슘
lt: E924b, Kalcio bromatas
lv: E924b, Kalcija bromāts
mk: E924b, Калциум бромат
mt: E924b, Bromat tal-kalċju
nl: E924b, Calciumbromaat
pl: E924b, Bromian wapnia
pt: E924b, Bromato de cálcio
ro: E924b, Bromat de calciu
ru: E924b, Бромат кальция
sk: E924b, Bromičnan vápenatý
sl: E924b, Kalcijev bromat
sq: E924b, Bromat kalciumi
sr: E924b, Калцијум бромат
sv: E924b, Kalciumbromat
th: E924b, แคลเซียมโบรเมต
tr: E924b, Kalsiyum bromat
uk: E924b, Бромат кальцію
vi: E924b, Canxi bromat
zh: E924b, 溴酸钙

en: E925, Chlorine, element 17
xx: E925
bg: E925, Хлор
cs: E925, chlor
da: E925, klor
de: E925, Chlor
el: E925, χλώριο
es: E925, cloro
et: E925, kloor
fi: E925, kloori, klooria
fr: E925, Chlore
hu: E925, klór
it: E925, cloro
lt: E925, chloras
lv: E925, hlors
mt: E925, kloru
nl: E925, Chloor
pl: E925, chlor
pt: E925, cloro
ro: E925, Clor
sk: E925, chlór
sl: E925, klor
sv: E925, klor

en: E926, Chlorine dioxide
xx: E926
ar: E926, ثاني أكسيد الكلور
az: E926, Xlor dioksid
bg: E926, Хлорен диоксид
ca: E926, Diòxid de clor
cs: E926, Oxid chloričitý, Kysličník chloričitý, ClO2
da: E926, Chlordioxid
de: E926, Chlordioxid, Chlor(IV)-oxid, ClO2, OClO
el: E926, Διοξείδιο του χλωρίου
eo: E926, Klora dioksido
es: E926, Dióxido de cloro
et: E926, Kloordioksiid
fi: E926, Klooridioksidi, Klooridioksidia
fr: E926, Dioxyde de chlore, ClO2, 10049-04-4
hu: E926, Klór-dioxid
it: E926, Diossido di cloro, Biossido di cloro, Ossido di cloro, ClO2
ja: E926, 二酸化塩素
ko: E926, 이산화 염소
lt: E926, Chloro dioksidas
lv: E926, Hlora dioksīds
nl: E926, Chloordioxide
pl: E926, Ditlenek chloru, Tlenek chloru(IV), Dwutlenek chloru
pt: E926, Dióxido de cloro
ro: E926, Dioxid de clor
ru: E926, Диоксид хлора
sk: E926, Oxid chloričitý
sl: E926, Klorov dioksid
sv: E926, Klordioxid
tr: E926, Klor dioksit
uk: E926, Діоксид хлору
zh: E926, 二氧化氯

en: E927, Azodicarbonamide and Carbamide
xx: E927
ar: E927, أزوديكاربوناميد وكارباميد
az: E927, Azodikarbonamid və Karbamid
bg: E927, Азодикарбонамид и Карбамид
ca: E927, Azodicarbonamida i Carbamide
cs: E927, Azodicarbonamid a Karbamide
da: E927, azodikarbonamid og karbamid, azodicarbonamid og carbamide
de: E927, Azodicarbonamid und Carbamide
el: E927, Αζοδικαρβοναμίδιο και Καρβαμίδιο
eo: E927, Azodicarbonamide kaj Carbamide
es: E927, Azodicarbonamida y Carbamide
et: E927, Asodikarbamiid ja Karbamiid
fi: E927, Atsoformamidi and Karbamidi, Atsoformamidia and Karbamidi, Atsoformamidi ja Karbamidi, Atsoformamidia ja Karbamidi
fr: E927, Azoformamide et Carbamide, Azodicarbonamide et Carbamide
hu: E927, Azodikarbonamid és karbamid
it: E927, Azodicarbonammide e Carbamide
ja: E927, アゾジカーボンアミドとカルバミド
ko: E927, 아조 디카르 본 아미드 및 카르 바 미드
lt: E927, Azodikarbonamidas ir Karbamidas
lv: E927, Azodikarbonamīds un Karbamīds
nl: E927, Azodicarbonamide en Carbamide
pl: E927, Azodikarbamid i Karbamid
pt: E927, Azodicarbonamida e Carbamida
ro: E927, Azodicarbonamidă Carbamidă, Azodicarbonamidă și Carbamidă
ru: E927, Азодикарбонамид и Карбамид
sk: E927, Azodikarbonamid a Karbamid
sl: E927, Azodikarbonamid in Karbamid
sv: E927, Azodikarbonamid och Karbamid
tr: E927, Azodikarbamid ve Karbamid
uk: E927, Азодикарбонамід і Карбамід
zh: E927, 偶氮二甲酰胺和卡巴胺

en: E927a, Azodicarbonamide
xx: E927a
ar: E927a, أزوديكاربوناميد
az: E927a, Azodikarbonamid
bg: E927a, Азодикарбонамид
ca: E927a, Azodicarbonamida
cs: E927a, Azodicarbonamid
da: E927a, azodikarbonamid, azodicarbonamid
de: E927a, Azodicarboxamid, Azodicarbonamid
el: E927a, Αζοδικαρβοναμίδιο
eo: E927a, Azodikarbonamido
es: E927a, Azodicarbonamida
et: E927a, Asodikarbamiid
fa: E927a, آزودیکربونآمید
fi: E927a, Atsodikarbonamidi, Atsodikarbonamidia
fr: E927a, Azoformamide, Azodicarbonamide
he: E927a, אזודיקרבונמיד
hi: E927a, एजोडिकार्बोनामाइड
hr: E927a, Azodikarbamid
hu: E927a, Azodikarbonamid
id: E927a, Azodikarbondiamida
it: E927a, Azodicarbonammide
ja: E927a, アゾジカーボンアミド
ko: E927a, 아조디카본아마이드
lt: E927a, Azodikarbamidas
lv: E927a, Azodikarbamīds
mk: E927a, Азодикарбонамид
mt: E927a, Ażodikarbonamide
nl: E927a, Azodicarbonamide
pl: E927a, Azodikarbamid
pt: E927a, Azodicarbonamida
ro: E927a, Azodicarbonamidă
ru: E927a, Азодикарбонамид
sk: E927a, Azodikarbonamid
sl: E927a, Azodikarbamid
sq: E927a, Azodikarbonamid
sr: E927a, Azodikarbonamid
ta: E927a, அசோ-டை-கார்போனமைடு
th: E927a, แอโซไดคาร์บอนาไมด์
tr: E927a, Azodikarbamid
uk: E927a, Азодикарбонамід
vi: E927a, Azodicarbonamide
zh: E927a, 偶氮甲酰胺

en: E927b, Carbamide, urea
xx: E927b
ar: E927b, يوريا
az: E927b, Karbamid
be: E927b, Мачавіна
bg: E927b, Карбамид, Пикочина, Карбонилдиамид, Урея, Уреа
bn: E927b, ইউরিয়া
bs: E927b, Urea
ca: E927b, Carbamida
cs: E927b, Karbamid, Močovina
da: E927b, karbamid, carbamid, urea, urinstof
de: E927b, Carbamid, Harnstoff, Urea, Kohlensäurediamid
el: E927b, Καρβαμιδιο, Ουρία
eo: E927b, ureo
es: E927b, Carbamida, Urea
et: E927b, Karbamiid, Uurea, Kusiaine
eu: E927b, Urea
fa: E927b, اوره
fi: E927b, Karbamidi, Urea, Virtsa-aine, Karbonyylidiamidi, Karbamidia, Ureaa, Virtsa-ainetta, Karbonyylidiamidia
fr: E927b, Carbamide, Urée, Perlurée
ga: E927b, Úiré
gl: E927b, Urea
gu: E927b, યુરિયા
he: E927b, שתנן
hi: E927b, यूरिया
hr: E927b, Urea
hu: E927b, Karbamid, Urea
hy: E927b, Միզանյութ
id: E927b, Urea
io: E927b, Ureo
is: E927b, Þvagefni
it: E927b, Carbammide, Urea, Ureici, Carbonildiammide
ja: E927b, 尿素
jv: E927b, Urea
ka: E927b, შარდოვანა
kk: E927b, Мочевина
kn: E927b, ಯೂರಿಯಾ
ko: E927b, 요소
ky: E927b, Мочевина
la: E927b, Urea, Ureum
lt: E927b, Karbamidas, Anglies rūgšties diamidas, Urėja, Anglies rūgšties diamindas, Šlapalas
lv: E927b, Karbamīds, Urīnviela
mk: E927b, уреја
ml: E927b, യൂറിയ
mn: E927b, Шүвтэр
mr: E927b, युरिया खत
ms: E927b, Urea
mt: E927b, E927b, Karbamida
nb: E927b, urea
ne: E927b, युरिया
nl: E927b, Carbamide, Ureum, Urea
nn: E927b, urea
oc: E927b, Urèa
pa: E927b, ਯੂਰੀਆ
pl: E927b, Karbamid, Mocznik
pt: E927b, Carbamida, Ureia
ro: E927b, Carbamidă, Uree
ru: E927b, мочевина
sh: E927b, Urea
sk: E927b, Karbamid, Močovina
sl: E927b, Karbamid, Sečnina, Urea
so: E927b, Yuuriya
sq: E927b, urea
sr: E927b, уреја
sv: E927b, Karbamid, Urea, Urinämne
ta: E927b, யூரியா
te: E927b, యూరియా
th: E927b, ยูเรีย
tr: E927b, Üre
uk: E927b, Сечовина
uz: E927b, Karbamid
vi: E927b, Urê
wa: E927b, Urea
zh: E927b, 尿素

en: E928, Benzole peroxide, benzoyl peroxide
xx: E928
af: E928, Bensoielperoksied
ar: E928, بيروكسيد البنزويل
az: E928, Benzoil peroksid
bg: E928, Бензоил пероксид
ca: E928, Peròxid de benzoil
cs: E928, Benzoylperoxid, Dibenzoylperoxid
da: E928, Benzoylperoxid
de: E928, Dibenzoylperoxid, DBPO, Benzoylperoxid, Benzylperoxyd
el: E928, Υπεροξείδιο του βενζοϋλίου
eo: E928, Benzoila peroksido
es: E928, Peróxido de benzoílo
et: E928, Bensoüülperoksiid
eu: E928, Bentzoil peroxido
fa: E928, بنزوئیل پراکسید
fi: E928, Bentsoyyliperoksidi, Basiron AC, Brevoxyl, Bentsoyylisuperoksidi, Dibentsoyyliperoksidi, Bentsoeyyliperoksidi, Bentsoyyliperoksidi, Basiron AC, Brevoxyl, Bentsoyylisuperoksidia, Dibentsoyyliperoksidia, Bentsoeyyliperoksidia
fr: E928, peroxyde de benzoyle
gl: E928, Peróxido de benzoílo
he: E928, בנזואיל פראוקסיד
hi: E928, बेंजोइल पेरोक्साइड
hr: E928, Benzoil peroksid
hu: E928, benzoil-peroxid, benzol-peroxid
id: E928, Benzoil peroksida
is: E928, Bensóýlperoxíð
it: E928, Benzoperossido
ja: E928, 過酸化ベンゾイル
ko: E928, 벤조일 퍼 옥사이드
lt: E928, Benzoilperoksidas
lv: E928, Benzoila peroksīds, Benzoilperoksīds
mk: E928, Бензоил пероксид
ms: E928, Benzoil peroksida
mt: E928, Perossidu tal-benżojl
nl: E928, Benzoylperoxide
no: E928, Benzoylperoksid
pl: E928, Nadtlenek benzoilu
pt: E928, Peróxido de benzoíla, Peróxido de benzoil
ro: E928, Peroxid de benzoil
ru: E928, Пероксид бензоила
sk: E928, Benzoylperoxid
sl: E928, Benzoilperoksid
sq: E928, Peroksid benzoil
sr: E928, Бензоил пероксид
sv: E928, Bensoylperoxid, Basiron, Stioxyl, Benzoylperoxid
th: E928, เบนโซอิลเปอร์ออกไซด์
tr: E928, Benzoil peroksit
uk: E928, Бензоїл пероксид
vi: E928, Benzoyl peroxide
zh: E928, 过氧化苯甲酰

en: E929, acetone peroxide, Mother of Satan, Triacetone Triperoxide, Peroxyacetone
xx: E929
bg: E929, Ацетонов пероксид
cs: E929, Peroxidy acetonu, Peroxoaceton, TATP, Peroxid acetonu
da: E929, Acetoneperoxid, TATP, Satans Mor, Acetone peroxid, Triacetoneperoxid
de: E929, Acetonperoxid, TATP, Triacetontriperoxid, Acetonperoxyd, Azetonperoxid
es: E929, Peróxido de acetona, Peroxiacetona, TATP
fi: E929, Asetoniperoksidi, Dppp, Tcap, Asetoniperoksidia
fr: E929, Peroxyde d’acétone, C12H24O8, 17088-37-8, TATP, C9H18O6
hu: E929, Aceton-peroxid
it: E929, Perossido di acetone, Triperossido di triacetone, TATP, C9H18O6, Perossido di tricicloacetone, TCAP, Perossiacetone
lt: E929, Acetono peroksidas
lv: E929, Acetona peroksīds, Tatp, C9h18o6
nl: E929, Acetonperoxide, Peroxyaceton, Triaceton-triperoxide, TATP, Aceton-peroxide, Tricycloaceton-peroxide
pl: E929, Nadtlenek acetonu, CTAP, TCAP, TATP
pt: E929, Triperóxido de triacetona, Peróxido de acetona, TATP
ro: E929, Peroxid de acetonă
sl: E929, Aceton peroksid
sv: E929, Acetonperoxid, ATCP, Tricykloacetonperoxid, TATP, Triacetontriperoxid, TCAP, Acetontricykloperoxid

en: E930, calcium peroxide
xx: E930
af: E930, Kalsiumperoksied
ar: E930, بيروكسيد الكالسيوم
az: E930, Kalsium peroksid
bg: E930, Калциев пероксид
ca: E930, Peròxid de calci
cs: E930, Peroxid vápenatý
da: E930, Calciumperoxid
de: E930, Calciumperoxid, Calciumdioxid, E 930, Calciumsuperoxid
el: E930, Υπεροξείδιο του ασβεστίου
eo: E930, Kalcia peroksido
es: E930, Peróxido de calcio
et: E930, Kaltsiumperoksiid
fi: E930, Kalsiumperoksidi, Kalsiumperoksidia
fr: E930, Peroxyde de Calcium
gl: E930, Peróxido de calcio
he: E930, תחמוצת סידן
hi: E930, कैल्शियम पेरोक्साइड
hr: E930, Kalcijev peroksid
hu: E930, Kalcium-peroxid
id: E930, Kalsium peroksida
it: E930, Perossido di calcio
ja: E930, 過酸化カルシウム
ko: E930, 과산화칼슘
lt: E930, Kalcio peroksidas
lv: E930, Kalcija peroksīds
mk: E930, Калциум пероксид
mt: E930, Perossidu tal-kalċju
nl: E930, Calciumperoxide
pl: E930, Nadtlenek wapnia
pt: E930, Peróxido de cálcio
ro: E930, Citrat de monoizopropil, Peroxid de calciu
ru: E930, Пероксид кальция
sk: E930, Peroxid vápenatý
sl: E930, Kalcijev peroksid
sq: E930, Peroksid kalciumi
sr: E930, Калцијум пероксид
sv: E930, Kalciumperoxid
th: E930, แคลเซียมเปอร์ออกไซด์
tr: E930, Kalsiyum peroksit
uk: E930, Пероксид кальцію
vi: E930, Canxi peroxit
zh: E930, 过氧化钙

en: E931, Nitrogen
xx: E931
bg: E931, Nitrogen
cs: E931, Nitrogen
da: E931, Nitrogen
de: E931, Nitrogen
el: E931, Nitrogen
es: E931, Nitrogen
et: E931, Nitrogen
fi: E931, Typpi
fr: E931, Nitrogène, Azote
hu: E931, Nitrogen
it: E931, Azoto
lt: E931, Azotas
lv: E931, Azots
mt: E931, Nitrogen
nl: E931, Stikstof
pl: E931, Azot
pt: E931, Azoto
ro: E931, Nitrogen, Azot
sk: E931, Nitrogen
sl: E931, Dušik
sv: E931, Kväve

en: E932, Nitrogen oxide
xx: E932
af: E932, Stikstofoksied
ar: E932, أكسيد النيتروجين
az: E932, Azot oksid
bg: E932, Азотен оксид
ca: E932, Òxid de nitrogen
cs: E932, Oxid dusíku
da: E932, Nitrogenoxid
de: E932, Stickstoffoxid
el: E932, Οξείδιο του αζώτου
eo: E932, Nitrogena oksido
es: E932, Óxido de nitrógeno
et: E932, Lämmastikoksiid
fa: E932, اکسید نیتروژن
fi: E932, Typpioksidi, Typpioksidia
fr: E932, Oxyde d'azote
gl: E932, Óxido de nitróxeno
he: E932, תחמוצת חנקן
hi: E932, नाइट्रोजन ऑक्साइड
hr: E932, Dušikov oksid
hu: E932, Nitrogén-oxid
id: E932, Nitrogen oksida
it: E932, Ossido di azoto
ja: E932, 窒素酸化物
ko: E932, 질소 산화물
lt: E932, Azoto oksidas
lv: E932, Slāpekļa oksīds
mk: E932, Азотен оксид
mt: E932, Ossidu tan-nitroġenu
nl: E932, Stikstofoxide
pl: E932, Tlenek azotu
pt: E932, Óxido de azoto
ro: E932, Oxid de azot
ru: E932, Оксид азота
sk: E932, Oxid dusíka
sl: E932, Dušikov oksid
sq: E932, Oksid azoti
sr: E932, Азотни оксид
sv: E932, Kväveoxid
th: E932, ไนโตรเจนออกไซด์
tr: E932, Azot oksit
uk: E932, Оксид азоту
vi: E932, Ôxít nitơ
zh: E932, 氮氧化物

en: E938, Argon, element 18
xx: E938
bg: E938, Аргон
ca: E938, Argó
cs: E938, Argon
da: E938, Argon
de: E938, Argon
el: E938, Αργο
es: E938, Argón
et: E938, Argoon
fi: E938, Argon, Argonia
fr: E938, Argon
hu: E938, Argon
it: E938, Argon, argo
lt: E938, Argonas
lv: E938, Argons
mt: E938, Argon
nl: E938, Argon
pl: E938, Argon
pt: E938, Árgon, árgão, argónio
ro: E938, Argon
ru: E938, Аргон
sk: E938, Argón
sl: E938, Argon
sv: E938, Argon

en: E939, Helium, element 2
xx: E939
bg: E939, Хелий
ca: E939, Heli
cs: E939, Helium
da: E939, Helium
de: E939, Helium
el: E939, Ηλιο
es: E939, Helio
et: E939, Heelium
fi: E939, Helium, Heliumia
fr: E939, Hélium
hu: E939, Hélium
it: E939, Elio
lt: E939, Helis
lv: E939, Hēlijs
mt: E939, Elju
nl: E939, Helium
pl: E939, Hel
pt: E939, Hélio, elemento 2
ro: E939, Heliu
ru: E939, Гелий
sk: E939, Hélium
sl: E939, Helij
sv: E939, Helium

en: E940, Dichlorodifluoromethane
xx: E940
cs: E940, Dichlordifluormethan, Propellant 12, Difluordichlormethan, Difluordichlormetan, CFC-012, CCl2F2, CFC-12, UN 1028, Arcton 12, Freon 12, Arcton 6, R-12, Halon 122, Dichlordifluormetan, P-12
de: E940, Dichlordifluormethan, CFC-12, Freon-12, Frigen 12, Freon12, Difluordichlormethan
el: E940, Διφθοροδιχλωρομεθάνιο, Φρεόν, Διχλωροδιφθορομεθάνιο
fi: E940, Difluoridikloorimetaani, Diklooridifluorimetaani, Freon-12, Difluoridikloorimetaania, Diklooridifluorimetaania
fr: E940, Dichlorodifluorométhane, 75-71-8, CCl2F2, CFC12, CFC-12, Fréon 12
hu: E940, Difluor-diklórmetán
it: E940, Diclorodifluorometano, CCl2F2
nl: E940, Dichlorodifluormethaan, Dichloordifluormethaan, Dichlorodifluoromethaan
pl: E940, Dichlorodifluorometan, Dwuchlorodwufluorometan, Freon-12, CCl2F2
pt: E940, Diclorodifluorometano, Diclorodifluormetano
ro: E940, Diclorodifluoro-metan
ru: E940, Дихлордифторметан, Дифтордихлорметан, Фреон-12, R-12, Хладон - 12
sv: E940, Difluordiklormetan, CFC-12, Diklordifluormetan, Freon 12, Halon 122

en: E941, Nitrogen, nitrogen E941
xx: E941
af: E941, stikstof
am: E941, ናይትሮጅን
an: E941, Nitrochén
ar: E941, نيتروجين
as: E941, নাইট্ৰ'জেন
az: E941, Azot
ba: E941, Азот
be: E941, азот
bg: E941, Азот
bn: E941, নাইট্রোজেন
bo: E941, ཟེ་རླུང་།
br: E941, Nitrogen
bs: E941, dušik
ca: E941, Nitrogen
co: E941, Azotu
cs: E941, Dusík
cv: E941, Азот
cy: E941, nitrogen
da: E941, Nitrogen, kvælstof
de: E941, Stickstoff, Stickstoff zum Aufschlagen
el: E941, Αζωτο
eo: E941, nitrogeno
es: E941, Nitrógeno, ázoe
et: E941, Lämmastik
eu: E941, nitrogeno
fa: E941, نیتروژن
fi: E941, Typpi, Typpeä
fo: E941, Køvievni
fr: E941, Azote
fy: E941, Stikstof
ga: E941, Nítrigin
gd: E941, Naitridean
gl: E941, nitróxeno
gu: E941, નત્રલવાયુ
gv: E941, Neetragien
he: E941, חנקן
hi: E941, नाइट्रोजन
hr: E941, Dušik
ht: E941, Azòt
hu: E941, Nitrogén
hy: E941, ազոտ
ia: E941, nitrogeno
id: E941, Nitrogen
io: E941, nitro
is: E941, köfnunarefni
it: E941, Azoto, nitrogen, agente di carica E941
ja: E941, 窒素
jv: E941, Nitrogen
ka: E941, აზოტი
ki: E941, Nitrogen
kk: E941, Азот
km: E941, អាសូត
kn: E941, ಸಾರಜನಕ
ko: E941, 질소
ku: E941, Nîtrojen
ky: E941, Азот
la: E941, nitrogenium
lb: E941, Stéckstoff
li: E941, Stikstof
ln: E941, Azoti
lt: E941, Azotas
lv: E941, Slāpeklis
mi: E941, hauota
mk: E941, азот
ml: E941, നൈട്രജൻ
mn: E941, Азот
mr: E941, नत्रवायू
ms: E941, Nitrogen
mt: E941, Nitroġenu, ażotu
my: E941, နိုက်ထရိုဂျင်
nb: E941, nitrogen
ne: E941, नाइट्रोजन
nl: E941, Stikstof
oc: E941, azòt
or: E941, ଯବକ୍ଷାରଜାନ
os: E941, Азот
pa: E941, ਨਾਈਟ੍ਰੋਜਨ
pi: E941, नाइट्रोजन
pl: E941, Azot
pt: E941, Azoto, nitrogénio
qu: E941, Qullpachaq
ro: E941, Azot
ru: E941, Азот
sa: E941, नैट्रोजन्
sh: E941, Dušik
si: E941, නයිට්‍රජන්
sk: E941, Dusík
sl: E941, Dušik
sn: E941, Nitrogen
so: E941, Nitrojiin
sq: E941, Azoti
sr: E941, азот
su: E941, Nitrogén
sv: E941, Kväve
sw: E941, Nitrojeni
ta: E941, நைதரசன்
te: E941, నత్రజని
tg: E941, Азот
th: E941, ไนโตรเจน
tl: E941, Nitroheno
tr: E941, Azot
tt: E941, Азот
ug: E941, ئازوت
uk: E941, азот
ur: 941, نطرساز
uz: 941, Azot
vi: 941, nitơ
yi: 941, אזאט
yo: 941, Nítrójínì
zh: 941, 氮

en: E942, Nitrous oxide, propellent gas E942
xx: E942
ar: E942, أكسيد النيتروس
az: E942, Azot-1 oksid
bg: E942, Азотист оксид, Диазотен оксид, Райски газ
bn: E942, নাইট্রাস অক্সাইড
bs: E942, Dušik suboksid
ca: E942, Òxid nitrós, oxid nitros
cs: E942, Oxid dusný, Azoxid, Rajský plyn, Kysličník dusný, Azooxid
cy: E942, ocsid nitrus
da: E942, Dinitrogenoxid, Lattergas
de: E942, Distickstoffoxid, Distickstoffmonoxid, Lachgas, Stickoxidul, Stickoxydul, Kapsler, Distickstoffmonooxid, Azo-oxid, Azooxid, Treibgas E942
el: E942, Υποξειδιο του αζωτου, πρωτοξείδιο του αζώτου, άεριο του γέλιου, αέριο γέλιου, ιλαρυντικό αέριο
es: E942, Óxido nitroso, Óxido de nitrógeno (I), Óxido de dinitrógeno, Gas ilarante, Gas de la risa, Gas hilarante, drijfgas E942
et: E942, Dilämmastikmonooksiid, Dilämmastikoksiid, Naerugaas
eu: E942, Oxido nitroso
fa: E942, دی نیتروژن مونوکسید
fi: E942, Typpioksiduuli, Ilokaasu, Dityppioksidi, Dityppimonoksidi, Typpioksiduulia, Ilokaasua, Dityppioksidia, Dityppimonoksidia, ponnekaasu E942
fr: E942, Protoxyde d'azote, oxyde nitreux, hémioxyde d'azote, gaz hilarant, N2O, Oxyde de diazote, Protoxide d'azote, gaz propulseur E942
ga: E942, Ocsaíd nítriúil
gl: E942, Óxido nitroso
he: E942, חמצן דו-חנקני
hi: E942, द्विभूयाति जारेय
hr: E942, Dušikov-I oksid
hu: E942, Dinitrogén-oxid
hy: E942, Ծիծաղեցնող գազ
id: E942, Dinitrogen oksida
it: E942, Protossido di azoto, Ossido di diazoto, Monossido di diazoto, Protossido d'azoto, Ossido nitroso, Nitrous Oxide Systems, Anidride iponitrosa, Ossidulo di azoto
ja: E942, 亜酸化窒素
kk: E942, Шаттандырғыш газ
ko: E942, 아산화 질소
lt: E942, Diazoto oksidas, Diazoto monoksidas, Azoto suboksidas, Juoko dujos
lv: E942, Slāpekļ-i oksīds, Dislāpekļa oksīds, Smieklu gāze, Jautrības gāze, Slāpekļa oksiduls, Slāpekļa-V oksonitrīds
mk: E942, азотен субоксид
ml: E942, നൈട്രസ് ഓക്സൈഡ്
ms: E942, Nitrus oksida
mt: E942, Ossidu nitruż
nb: E942, Dinitrogenoksid
ne: E942, नाइट्रस अक्साइड
nl: E942, Distikstofoxide, distikstofmonoxide, Lachgas, drijfgas E942
nn: E942, dinitrogenmonoksid
or: E942, ନାଇଟ୍ରସ ଅକ୍ସାଇଡ
pl: E942, Podtlenek azotu, Tlenek diazotu
pt: E942, Óxido nitroso, Óxido de dinitrogênio, Gás hilariante, Gás do riso, Gás de estufa, Protóxido de nitrogênio
ro: E942, Protoxid de azot, Gaz ilariant
ru: E942, Закись азота, оксид азота-I, Веселящий газ, Азота закись, Оксид диазота, Смехогаз, Динитрогена оксид, Динитрогена моноокись, Низший оксид азота
sh: E942, Azotsuboksid
sk: E942, Oxid dusný
sl: E942, Dušikov-i oksid, Didušikov oksid, Rajni plin, Smejalni plin
sr: E942, азотсубоксид
sv: E942, Dikväveoxid, Lustgas, Kväveoxidul, Dikvävemonoxid, Entonox, Kalinox, Medimix, Salpeteroxid
ta: E942, நைட்ரஸ் ஆக்சைடு
th: E942, ไนตรัสออกไซด์
uk: E942, Оксид азотуvi:Dinitơ monoxid
zh: E942, 一氧化二氮

en: E943a, Butane
xx: E943a
bg: E943a, Бутан
ca: E943a, Butà
cs: E943a, Butan, CH3CH2CH2CH3, N-butan
da: E943a, Butan, Lightergas, Butangas
de: E943a, Butan, n-Butan, Butangas
el: E943a, Βουτανιο, PrMe, Διαιθύλιο
es: E943a, Butano, N-butano, Gas butano, Butilo
et: E943a, Butaan
fi: E943a, Butaani, N-butaani, Butaania, N-butaania
fr: E943a, Butane, n-butane
hu: E943a, Bután
it: E943a, Butano, N-butano
lt: E943a, Butanas
lv: E943a, Butāns
mt: E943a, Butan
nl: E943a, Butaan, Orthobutaan
pl: E943a, Butan, N-Butan, Metylopropan
pt: E943a, Butano, N-butano, Gás butano
ro: E943a, Butan
sk: E943a, Bután
sl: E943a, Butan
sv: E943a, Butan, Butangas, N-butan